Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.805

Revenues derived from certain university lands and income from university permanent fund deposited in University of Washington bond retirement fund—Ratification of previous transfers.

The transfers heretofore made of all moneys from the sources described in RCW 28B.20.800 and 43.79.201 into the University of Washington bond retirement fund and permanent fund are in all respects ratified and confirmed.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.805. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 135 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.77.630.]